Indiana, session 2026, HB1046.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-12-16.2-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.201-2023,
SECTION 70, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The following accounts are established within
the fund:
(1) The state unrestricted opioid settlement account. The account
consists of money distributed to the account under
IC 4-6-15-4(a)(1) and any interest earnings that accrue to the fund
under section 7 of this chapter. Expenditures from the account
may be made only after appropriation of the money in the account
by the general assembly. Money in the account must be used by
the state for oversight and administration of programs for
treatment, education, recovery, and prevention of opioid use
disorder and any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental
health issues. Money in the account may be used for the
funding of family recovery courts and safe baby courts (as
defined in IC 33-23-16-9.5) under IC 33-23-16.5.
(2) The state abatement opioid settlement account. The account
2026 IN 1046—LS 6297/DI 151


consists of money distributed to the account under
IC 4-6-15-4(a)(3) and the balance of any opioid litigation
settlements remaining prior to the passage of P.L.72-2022. Money
in the account is continuously appropriated to the office of the
secretary of family and social services for treatment, education,
recovery, and prevention programs for opioid use disorder and
any co-occurring substance use disorder or mental health issues
as defined or required by the settlement documents or court order.
Before the funds received under this subdivision may be
distributed, the office of the secretary of family and social
services shall submit a distribution plan to the budget committee
for review.
SECTION 2. IC 33-23-16.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 16.5. Family Recovery Court Fund
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "family recovery court" means
a court that:
(1) targets cases of abuse or neglect wherein a parent or
primary caregiver suffers from a substance use disorder or
co-occurring disorders; and
(2) is certified as a problem solving court under
IC 33-23-16-17 by the office of judicial administration.
Sec. 2. The family recovery court fund is established to carry
out the purpose of funding family recovery courts and safe baby
courts (as defined in IC 33-23-16-9.5) under IC 33-23-16.
Sec. 3. The office of judicial administration shall administer the
fund.
Sec. 4. The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid
from money in the fund.
Sec. 5. The fund consists of the following:
(1) Money appropriated by the general assembly from the
state unrestricted opioid settlement account established under
IC 4-12-16.2-5(1).
(2) Donations, gifts, and money received from any other
source, including transfers from other funds or accounts.
Sec. 6. Money in the fund is continuously appropriated for the
purpose of the fund.
Sec. 7. The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund
not currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from the investments shall be deposited in the fund.
2026 IN 1046—LS 6297/DI 151


Sec. 8. Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does
not revert to the state general fund.
2026 IN 1046—LS 6297/DI 151